Odia_apertium_morph_dict.dix
<?xml version="1.0"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
<sdefs>
<sdef n="cat:v" c="verb"/>

<sdef n="cat:n" c="noun"/>
<sdef n="cat:prsg" c="parsarg(ViBakwi-PostPosition)"/>
<sdef n="cat:adj" c="adjective"/>
<sdef n="cat:conj" c="conjuction"/>
<sdef n="cat:emph" c="emphatic marker"/>
<sdef n="cat:neg" c="negation"/>
<sdef n="cat:p" c="pronoun"/>

<sdef n="num:s" c="singular"/>
<sdef n="num:p" c="plural"/>
<sdef n="tam:0" c="tense aspect modality"/>
<sdef n="per:u" c="first"/>
<sdef n="per:m" c="second"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h0" c="second_nonhonorific wu yAu"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h1" c="second_honorific wume yAa"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h2" c="second_honorific ApaNa yAAnwu"/>
<sdef n="per:a" c="third"/>

<sdef n="gen:any" c="any gender"/>
<sdef n="gen:m" c="masculine"/>
<sdef n="gen:f" c="feminine"/>
<sdef n="neg:y" c="yes"/>

<sdef n="tam:uCi" c="uCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:0" c="0"/>
<sdef n="tam:iCi" c="iCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:ilA" c="ilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:uWilA" c="uWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:iWilA" c="iWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:uWiba" c="uWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:iWiba" c="iWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:ba" c="ba"/>
<sdef n="tam:anwA" c="anwA"/>
<sdef n="tam:uWAnwA" c="uWAnwA"/>
<sdef n="tam:iWAnwA" c="iWAnwA"/>
<sdef n="tam:uWAe" c="uWAe"/>
<sdef n="tam:iWAe" c="iWAe"/>
<sdef n="tam:nie" c="nie"/>
<sdef n="tam:xie" c="xie"/>
<sdef n="tam:yAe" c="yAe"/>
<sdef n="tam:yiba" c="yiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:heba" c="heba"/>
<sdef n="tam:Ni" c="Ni"/>
<sdef n="tam:galA" c="galA"/>
<sdef n="tam:imper" c="imperative(AFjAvAcaka)"/>
<sdef n="tam:yAuCi" c="yAuCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:yAiCi" c="yAiCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:yAuWilA" c="yAuWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yAiWilA" c="yAiWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yAuWiba" c="yAuWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:yAiWiba" c="yAiWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:xeuCi" c="xeuCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:xeiCi" c="xeiCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:xelA" c="xelA"/>
<sdef n="tam:xeuWilA" c="xeuWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:xeiWilA" c="xeiWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:xeba" c="xeba"/>
<sdef n="tam:xeuWiba" c="xeuWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:xeiWiba" c="xeiWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:neuCi" c="neuCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:neiCi" c="neiCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:nelA" c="nelA"/>
<sdef n="tam:neuWilA" c="neuWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:neiWilA" c="neiWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:neba" c="neba"/>
<sdef n="tam:neuWiba" c="neuWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:neiWiba" c="neiWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:pakAe" c="pakAe"/>
<sdef n="tam:pakAuCi" c="pakAuCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:pakAiCi" c="pakAiCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:pakAilA" c="pakAilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:pakAuWilA" c="pakAuWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:pakAiWilA" c="pakAiWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:pakAiba" c="pakAiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:pakAuWiba" c="pakAuWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:pakAiWiba" c="pakAiWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:base" c="base"/>
<sdef n="tam:basuCi" c="basuCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:basiCi" c="basiCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:basilA" c="basilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:basuWilA" c="basuWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:basiWilA" c="basiWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:basiba" c="basiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:basuWiba" c="basuWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:basiWiba" c="basiWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:pAre" c="pAre"/>
<sdef n="tam:pAruCi" c="pAruCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:pAriCi" c="pAriCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:pArilA" c="pArilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:pAruWilA" c="pAruWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:pAriWilA" c="pAriWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:pAriba" c="pAriba"/>
<sdef n="tam:pAruWiba" c="pAruWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:pAriWiba" c="pAriWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:Ase" c="Ase"/>
<sdef n="tam:AsuCi" c="AsuCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:AsiCi" c="AsiCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:AsilA" c="AsilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:AsuWilA" c="AsuWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:AsiWilA" c="AsiWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:Asiba" c="Asiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:AsuWiba" c="AsuWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:AsiWiba" c="AsiWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:pade" c="pade"/>
<sdef n="tam:paduCi" c="paduCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:padiCi" c="padiCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:padilA" c="padilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:paduWilA" c="paduWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:padiWilA" c="padiWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:padiba" c="padiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:paduWiba" c="paduWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:padiWiba" c="padiWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:uTe" c="uTe"/>
<sdef n="tam:uTuCi" c="uTuCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:uTiCi" c="uTiCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:uTilA" c="uTilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:uTuWilA" c="uTuWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:uTiWilA" c="uTiWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:uTiba" c="uTiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:uTuWiba" c="uTuWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:uTiWiba" c="uTiWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:cAle" c="cAle"/>
<sdef n="tam:cAluCi" c="cAluCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:cAliCi" c="cAliCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:cAlilA" c="cAlilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:cAluWilA" c="cAluWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:cAliWilA" c="cAliWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:cAliba" c="cAliba"/>
<sdef n="tam:cAluWiba" c="cAluWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:cAliWiba" c="cAliWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:sAre" c="sAre"/>
<sdef n="tam:sAruCi" c="sAruCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:sAriCi" c="sAriCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:sArilA" c="sArilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:sAruWilA" c="sAruWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:sAriWilA" c="sAriWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:sAriba" c="sAriba"/>
<sdef n="tam:sAruWiba" c="sAruWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:sAriWiba" c="sAriWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:ANe" c="ANe"/>
<sdef n="tam:ANuCi" c="ANuCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:ANiCi" c="ANiCi"/>
<sdef n="tam:ANilA" c="ANilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:ANuWilA" c="ANuWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:ANiWilA" c="ANiWilA"/>
<sdef n="tam:ANiba" c="ANiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:ANuWiba" c="ANuWiba"/>
<sdef n="tam:ANiWiba" c="ANiWiba"/>


<sdef n="prsg:0" c="0"/>
<sdef n="prsg:ku" c="ku"/>
<sdef n="prsg:ra" c="ra"/>
<sdef n="prsg:re" c="re"/>
<sdef n="prsg:ru" c="ru"/>
<sdef n="prsg:fku" c="fku"/>
<sdef n="prsg:fka" c="fka"/>
<sdef n="prsg:fkara" c="fkara"/>
<sdef n="prsg:fkaTAre" c="fkaTAre"/>
<sdef n="prsg:fkaTAru" c="fkaTAru"/>
<sdef n="prsg:fka_pAiz" c="fka_pAiz"/>
<sdef n="prsg:fka_xbArA" c="fka_xbArA"/>
<sdef n="prsg:xbArA" c="xbArA"/>
<sdef n="prsg:TAru" c="TAru"/>
<sdef n="prsg:TAre" c="TAre"/>

<sdef n="det:0" c="0"/>
<sdef n="det:ti" c="ti"/>
<sdef n="det:tA" c="tA"/>
<sdef n="det:te" c="te"/>
<sdef n="det:tAe" c="tAe"/>
<sdef n="det:tie" c="tie"/>
<sdef n="case:o" c="oblique"/>
<sdef n="case:d" c="direct"/>
</sdefs>
<pardefs>

<pardef n="parsarg">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:prsg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="conjuction">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:conj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="emphatic marker">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:emph"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="negation">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:neg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="k/aLA__adj">
<e><p><l>aLA</l><r>aLA<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ALi</l><r>aLA<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="XaLA/__adj">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sunxar/a__adj">
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Cot/A__adj">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aBAg/A__adj">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inI</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="miC/uA__adj">
<e><p><l>uA</l><r>uA<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ei</l><r>uA<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="muKy/a__adj">
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paropakAr/I__adj">
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>inI</l><r>I<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sahaXarm/A__adj">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iNI</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="buxXim/An__adj">
<e><p><l>An</l><r>An<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>awI</l><r>An<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ru"><i>ru</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="xbArA"><i>xbArA</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="Tuz"><i>Tuz</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="pari"><i>pari</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="byawIwa"><i>byawIwa</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="Biware"><i>Biware</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="purbe"><i>purbe</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="sakASe"><i>sakASe</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="biruXXare"><i>biruXXare</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="Au"><i>Au</i><par n="conjuction"/></e>
<e lm="ebaM"><i>ebaM</i><par n="conjuction"/></e>
<e lm="ye"><i>ye</i><par n="conjuction"/></e>
<e lm="kimbA"><i>kimbA</i><par n="conjuction"/></e>
<e lm="maXya"><i>maXya</i><par n="emphatic marker"/></e>
<e lm="bi"><i>bi</i><par n="emphatic marker"/></e>
<e lm="ki"><i>ki</i><par n="emphatic marker"/></e>
<e lm="yaxi"><i>yaxi</i><par n="conjuction"/></e>
<e lm="kimbA"><i>kimbA</i><par n="conjuction"/></e>
<e lm="ye"><i>ye</i><par n="conjuction"/></e>
<e lm="webe"><i>webe</i><par n="conjuction"/></e>
<e lm="ebaM"><i>ebaM</i><par n="conjuction"/></e>
<e lm="nAhiz"><i>nAhiz</i><par n="negation"/></e>
<e lm="ni"><i>ni</i><par n="negation"/></e>
<e lm="nA"><i>nA</i><par n="negation"/></e>
<e lm="nuhez"><i>nuhez</i><par n="negation"/></e>
<e lm="nAhAnwi"><i>nAhAnwi</i><par n="negation"/></e>
<e lm="nAhAznwi"><i>nAhAznwi</i><par n="negation"/></e>
<e lm="nAz"><i>nAz</i><par n="negation"/></e>
<e lm="kALi"><i>k</i><par n="k/aLA__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mArmika"><i>mArmik</i><par n="sunxar/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kaLA"><i>k</i><par n="k/aLA__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sunxara"><i>sunxar</i><par n="sunxar/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="CotA"><i>Cot</i><par n="Cot/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gorA"><i>gor</i><par n="Cot/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="defgA"><i>defg</i><par n="Cot/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pawaLA"><i>pawaL</i><par n="Cot/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anugawa"><i>augawa</i><par n="XaLA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aBinewA"><i>aBinew</i><par n="Cot/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="abihAdA"><i>abihAd</i><par n="Cot/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="abyabasWiwa"><i>abyabasWiwa</i><par n="XaLA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aBAgA"><i>aBAg</i><par n="aBAg/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aBijAwa"><i>aBijAwa</i><par n="XaLA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="miCuA"><i>miC</i><par n="miC/uA__adj"/></e>
<e lm="muKya"><i>muKy</i><par n="muKy/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nirApaxa"><i>nirApaxa</i><par n="XaLA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="paCuA"><i>paCuA</i><par n="XaLA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pariciwA"><i>pariciw</i><par n="muKy/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pawaLA"><i>pawaLA</i><par n="Cot/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="priya"><i>priya</i><par n="XaLA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sahapATinI"><i>sahapAT</i><par n="paropakAr/I__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sahapATI"><i>sahapAT</i><par n="paropakAr/I__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sAhasI"><i>sAhas</i><par n="paropakAr/I__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sahaXarmA"><i>sahaXarm</i><par n="sahaXarm/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sahaXarmiNI"><i>sahaXarm</i><par n="sahaXarm/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sahayAwrI"><i>sahayAwr</i><par n="paropakAr/I__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sAkAra"><i>sAkAr</i><par n="muKy/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="SakwiSALI"><i>SakwiSAL</i><par n="paropakAr/I__adj"/></e>
<e lm="buxXimAn"><i>buxXim</i><par n="buxXim/An__adj"/></e>
<e lm="buxXimawI"><i>buxXim</i><par n="buxXim/An__adj"/></e>
<e lm="SakwimAn"><i>Sakwim</i><par n="buxXim/An__adj"/></e>
<e lm="SakwimawI"><i>Sakwim</i><par n="buxXim/An__adj"/></e>
<e lm="samaxarSI"><i>samaxarS</i><par n="paropakAr/I__adj"/></e>
<e lm="samBrAnwA"><i>samBrAnw</i><par n="muKy/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="saMkuciwA"><i>saMkuciw</i><par n="muKy/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sAMpraxAyika"><i>sAMpraxAyika</i><par n="XaLA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="saMrakRiwa"><i>saMrakRiw</i><par n="muKy/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sannyAsI"><i>sannyAs</i><par n="paropakAr/I__adj"/></e>
<e lm="SocanIya"><i>SocanIy</i><par n="muKy/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sraRtA"><i>sraRt</i><par n="Cot/A__adj"/></e>
<e lm="suAxiA"><i>suAxiA</i><par n="XaLA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sWAyI"><i>sWAy</i><par n="paropakAr/I__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ugra"><i>ugr</i><par n="muKy/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="xakRiNa"><i>xakRiNa</i><par n="XaLA/__adj"/></e>
<e lm="xEbI"><i>xEb</i><par n="sunxar/a__adj"/></e>
